Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-166.11
Unconstitutional.

The Revisor of Statutes, as authorized by section 49-705, has omitted sections 53-166.01 to 53-166.17, which the Supreme Court has held to be unconstitutional. United States Brewers' Assn., Inc. v. State, 192 Neb. 328, 220 N.W.2d 544 (1974).